Alabama, session 2026rs, SB166.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 17-5-6.1 is added to the Code of
Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
§17-5-6.1
Each political action committee, principal campaign
committee, or other person required to file any report or
statement under this chapter may destroy any records after the
expiration of four years. For purposes of this section,
records include: (i) any record or account required under this
chapter; and (ii) a copy of each report or statement filed
under this chapter and all records relevant to the report or
statement.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 1

1, 2026.
SB166 Enrolled






________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate



________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives


SB166
Senate 03-Feb-26
I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
the Senate, as amended.

Patrick Harris,
Secretary.




House of Representatives
Passed: 07-Apr-26




By: Senator Figures
Page 2